Washington statutes.
RCW 24.20.020

Filing fee.

The secretary of state shall file such articles of incorporation in the secretary of state's office and issue a certificate of incorporation to any such lodge or other society upon the payment of the filing fee established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9116; 1993 c 269 s 10; 1982 c 35 s 165; 1903 c 80 s 2; RRS s 3866.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 269: See note following RCW 23.86.070.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.